Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-304
Registration; renewal.

(1) Before performing an electronic notarial act, a notary public shall register with the Secretary of State in a manner prescribed by the Secretary of State.

(2) The registration shall specify the technology the notary public intends to use to perform an electronic notarial act. Such technology shall be provided by an electronic notary solution provider approved by the Secretary of State.

(3) The term of registration as an electronic notary public shall coincide with the term of the commission of the notary public.

(4) A person registered as an electronic notary public may renew his or her electronic notary public registration at the same time he or she renews his or her notary public commission.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 4.